Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,143
Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

All fees collected pursuant to the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Cash Fund which is hereby created. Such fund shall be administered by the department for the purposes of the act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 128.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.